Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-302
Officials; liability; exemption.

Boards, council executives, or others having charge of juveniles mentioned in section 43-301 shall not be liable in damages to said juveniles so employed, or to the parent or guardian, or to any other standing in loco parentis.

Laws 1923, c. 127, § 2, p. 314;

C.S.1929, § 43-302;

R.S.1943, § 43-302.